Arkansas, session 2025, SB12.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 19, is amended to add an
additional section to read as follows:
25-19-113. Board of Apportionment communications - Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "communication regarding redistricting"
means a written communication, electronic communication, or oral
communication concerning the apportionment of the state for representatives
or otherwise pertaining to the drawing of legislative districts.
(b) A communication regarding redistricting by one (1) or more members
of the Board of Apportionment or staff of the board:
(1) Shall be:
(A) Written;
(B) Electronic; or
*LGL020*
02-05-2025 10:01:53 LGL020

As Engrossed: S2/3/25 S2/5/25 SB12
(C) An oral communication recorded at a public meeting
under § 25-19-106(d)(1); and
(2) Is a public record subject to this chapter.
(c) If one (1) or more members of the board or staff of the board
receive an oral communication regarding redistricting other than one recorded
at a public meeting under § 25-19-106(d)(1), the member of the board or his
or her staff shall:
(1) Inform the speaker that all communications by one (1) or
more members of the board or staff of the board must be:
(A) Written;
(B) Electronic; or
(C) An oral communication recorded at a public meeting
under § 25-19-106(d)(1); and
(2) Take all reasonable steps to remove himself or herself from
the oral communication that is not recorded at a public meeting under § 25-
19-106(d)(1).
(d) This section does not prohibit discussion regarding the
apportionment of the state for representatives at a public meeting of the
board.
(e) This section shall not be construed to exempt a public record of
the board from disclosure under this chapter if the public record would
otherwise be deemed to be made open under this chapter.
(f) A person who knowingly violates subdivision (b)(1) of this section
upon conviction is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

/s/B. King










02-05-2025 10:01:53 LGL020